Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.075

Court order for address confidentiality program participant information.

A court order for address confidentiality program participant information may only be issued upon a probable cause finding by a judicial officer that release of address confidentiality program participant information is legally necessary:

(1) In the course of a criminal investigation or prosecution; or

(2) To prevent immediate risk to a minor and meet the statutory requirements of the Washington child welfare system.

Any court order so issued will prohibit the release of the information to any other agency or person not a party to the order.

[ 2008 c 18 s 6.]